Hawaii statutes.
[PART III.]
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Revision Note

This part, designated as part IV by L 2009, c 183, §5, is
redesignated as part III pursuant to §23G-15.

[§339D-7] Regulatory authority. The
department may adopt rules, pursuant to chapter 91, necessary to implement this
chapter. [L Sp 2008, c 13, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next